Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-726
Nebraska Hall of Fame; purpose.

The purpose of the Nebraska Hall of Fame shall be to bring to public attention and to recognize officially those people who, in their lives, have achieved prominence and who were outstanding Nebraskans. For the purpose of this section Nebraskans shall mean those (1) who were born in Nebraska, (2) who gained prominence while living in Nebraska, or (3) who lived in Nebraska and whose residence in Nebraska was an important influence on their lives and which contributed to their greatness.

Laws 1961, c. 355, § 3, p. 1118.